Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 2 Georgia Crime Information Center
“(A) When an individual was convicted in this state of a misdemeanor or a series of misdemeanors arising from a single incident, and at the time of such conviction such individual was a youthful offender, provided that such individual successfully completed the terms of his or her sentence and, since completing the terms of his or her sentence, has not been arrested for at least five years, excluding any arrest for a nonserious traffic offense, and provided, further, that he or she was not convicted in this state of a misdemeanor violation or under any other state’s law with similar provisions of one or more of the offenses listed in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, he or she may petition the court in which the conviction occurred to restrict access to criminal history record information. Such court shall maintain jurisdiction over the case for this limited purpose and duration. Such petition shall be served on the prosecuting attorney. If a hearing is requested, such hearing shall be held within 90 days of the filing of the petition. The court shall hear evidence and shall determine whether granting an order restricting such criminal history record information is appropriate, giving due consideration to the individual’s conduct and the public’s interest in the criminal history record information being publicly available.

“(B) Record restriction shall not be appropriate if the individual was convicted of:

“(i) Child molestation in violation of Code Section 16-6-4;

“(ii) Enticing a child for indecent purposes in violation of Code Section 16-6-5;

“(iii) Improper sexual contact by employee or agent in violation of Code Section 16-6-5.1;

“(iv) Keeping a place of prostitution in violation of Code Section 16-6-10;

“(v) Pimping in violation of Code Section 16-6-11;

“(vi) Pandering by compulsion in violation of Code Section 16-6-14;

“(vii) Masturbation for hire in violation of Code Section 16-6-16;

“(viii) Giving massages in a place used for lewdness, prostitution, assignation, or masturbation for hire in violation of Code Section 16-6-17;

“(ix) Sexual battery in violation of Code Section 16-6-22.1;

“(x) Any offense related to minors generally in violation of Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 12 of Title 16;

“(xi) Theft in violation of Chapter 8 of Title 16; provided, however, that such prohibition shall not apply to a misdemeanor conviction of shoplifting or refund fraud in violation of Code Section 16-8-14 or 16-8-14.1, as applicable; or

“(xii) Any serious traffic offense in violation of Article 15 of Chapter 6 of Title 40.”; added (j)(6); substituted “offense that has been restricted” for “charge” at the end of the last sentence in paragraph (k)(1) and twice in paragraph (k)(2); substituted “which” for “arising out of an arrest of which the information” near the end of paragraph (k)(3); in the first sentence of paragraph (m)(1), substituted “offenses” for “charges” and “charged offense” for “charge”; deleted former paragraph (m)(4), which read: “The person who is the subject of such sealed criminal history record information may petition the court for inspection of the criminal history record information included in the court order. Such information shall always be available for inspection, copying, and use by criminal justice agencies and the Judicial Qualifications Commission.”; and added subsections (s) through (w).

The 2021 amendments.

The first 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “or agent, improper sexual contact by a foster parent, and improper sexual contact by person in a position of trust” for “or agent and improper sexual contact by a foster parent” in division (j)(4)(B)(viii). The second 2021 amendment, effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted double quotation marks for single quotation marks preceding and following the phrase “prosecuting attorney” in the middle of paragraph (a)(5); substituted “Code Section 16-13-2 or” for “Code Section 16-13-2, or” in subparagraph (h)(2)(B); and substituted “Code Section 3-3-23.1 or” for “Code Section 3-3-23.1, or” in subparagraph (h)(2)(C).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, a period was added at the end of paragraph (j)(3).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, paragraph (j)(6) as added by Ga. L. 2020, p. 753, § 1-1/SB 288, was redesignated as paragraph (j)(7) given the addition of paragraph (j)(6) by Ga. L. 2020, p. 90, §
3/SB 435.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 139, § 7, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that no local ordinance which was in effect on March 22, 1995, shall be affected by Code Section 16-11-184 until January 1, 1996, at which time, unless enacted subsequent to March 22, 1995, as provided by that Code section, any such ordinance shall be of no further force or effect, and further provides that no ordinance or regulation attempting to regulate firearms in any manner shall be enacted by any county, city, or municipality after July 1, 1995.

Ga. L. 1995, p. 139, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that subsection (f) of this Code section shall be repealed automatically upon a final judicial determination that such Act is invalid for any reason.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 6-2/HB 1176, effective July 1, 2013, repealed the former Code section and enacted the current Code section. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1973, p. 1301, § 6; Ga. L. 1995, p. 139, § 4; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1345, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 35/HB 942.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that Part VI of this Act, which amended this Code section, shall become fully effective on July 1, 2013; provided, however, that for the purpose of preparing for implementation of Part VI of this Act, said part shall become effective on July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 222, § 21/HB 349, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2013, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date. Any offense occurring before July 1, 2013, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense.”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 79, § 1/SB 320, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly recognizes that veterans have provided and continue to provide an invaluable service to our country and this state.
In connection with a veteran’s service, some servicemen and servicewomen have incurred physical, emotional, or mental impairments which cause or contribute to behaviors that may draw a veteran into the criminal justice system.
The General Assembly has determined that having dedicated veterans court divisions is important to address the specialized treatment needs of veterans and that there are resources, services, and treatment options that are unique to veterans that may best facilitate a veteran’s reentry into society.”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 404, § 3-1/SB 382, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2014, and shall apply to all conduct occurring on or after such date.”

Ga. L. 2020, p. 90, § 1/SB 435, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Survivors First Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For article, “Appeal and Error: Appeal or Certiorari by State in Criminal Cases,” see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 17 (2013).

For annual survey on criminal law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 37 (2014).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

For note, “Give It to Me, I’m Worth It:
The Need to Amend Georgia’s Record Restriction Statute to Provide Ex-Offenders with a Second Chance in the Employment Sector,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 267 (2017).

For article with annual survey on labor and employment law, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 137 (2021).